Missouri, session 2026, SB1048.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 173, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 173.237, to read as
follows:
173.237. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Missouri Disabled Veterans' Dependents Tuition
Waiver".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Board", the coordinating board for higher
education;
(2) "Institution", any approved public institution, as
defined in subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section
173.1102;
(3) "Tuition", any tuition or incidental fee, or both,
charged by an institution for attendance at the institution
by a student as a resident of this state, but not to exceed
the amount of tuition charged to a Missouri resident at the
University of Missouri-Columbia for attendance;
(4) "Tuition waiver" or "waiver", a tuition waiver
granted pursuant to the provisions of this section.

SB 1048 2
3. A dependent of a veteran shall be eligible for a
waiver of all tuition remaining due to an institution after
subtracting awarded federal financial aid grants and state
scholarships and grants if the dependent meets the following
requirements:
(1) The dependent is a resident of this state who
meets the institution's requirements for establishing
Missouri residency for the purpose of paying in-state
tuition;
(2) The dependent has a parent, stepparent, or spouse
who is or was a member of the armed forces of the United
States who:
(a) Died while on active duty;
(b) Died of a service-connected disability;
(c) Died subsequent to discharge from the armed forces
as a result of injury or illness sustained while serving as
a member of the armed forces, whether or not the injury or
illness resulted in total disability;
(d) Is rated as permanently and totally disabled as a
result of military service as certified by the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs, excluding temporary total
disability ratings or other temporary disability ratings
given for conditions expected to improve, but including
ratings for total disability based on individual
unemployability if the unemployability is permanent; or
(e) Is classified as missing in action or as a
prisoner of war during armed hostilities while serving as a
member of the armed forces; and
(3) If the dependent is a child or stepchild of a
veteran described in subdivision (2) of this subsection,
such dependent shall be under twenty-six years of age,
unless the dependent serves on active duty with the armed

SB 1048 3
forces of the United States after such dependent's
eighteenth birthday but before such dependent's twenty-sixth
birthday, in which case the eligibility period shall end
five years after the date of the dependent's first discharge
or release from duty from the armed forces, but in no event
shall such eligibility period be extended beyond the
dependent's thirty-first birthday.
4. An application for a tuition waiver shall be
submitted on a form to be prescribed by the executive
director of the Missouri veterans commission. The executive
director shall ensure that the application process is
accessible, transparent, and efficiently administered.
5. The executive director of the Missouri veterans
commission or the executive director's designee shall:
(1) Establish application procedures by prescribing
and providing all necessary forms, setting application
deadlines, and determining required documentation for
dependents of disabled veterans to apply for the tuition
waiver;
(2) Review and determine applicant eligibility, verify
documentation, and certify approved applicants. Upon
certification, the executive director shall notify the
applicant and the institution in which the applicant desires
to enroll. The executive director's decision shall be final
and binding, absent fraud or misrepresentation;
(3) Promulgate necessary rules and regulations to
ensure effective administration of this section, including
procedures for eligibility verification, fraud prevention,
and program oversight;
(4) Coordinate with the board to facilitate
communication with institutions, ensure proper

SB 1048 4
implementation of waivers, and maintain program efficiency;
and
(5) Oversee program compliance and reporting by
maintaining records of waiver recipients, monitoring
participation, and providing periodic reports to the board.
6. The board shall:
(1) Ensure consistent implementation of this section
across all institutions, including institutional compliance
and reporting;
(2) Develop and distribute procedures and guidelines
for institutions to process tuition waivers, ensuring that
certified applicants are enrolled without tuition charges;
and
(3) Coordinate with the Missouri veterans commission
to ensure seamless communication between certifying
authorities and institutions, preventing administrative
delays for eligible applicants.
7. The waiver shall be valid for one degree, diploma,
or certificate from a community college and one
baccalaureate degree from a state college or university.
100 Receipt of such degree, diploma, or certificate from a
101 community college shall precede receipt of such
102 baccalaureate degree.
103 8. (1) A recipient of a tuition waiver shall be
104 ineligible for any other state-funded veteran-dependent
105 tuition grant, waiver, or scholarship, including, but not
106 limited to, grants established in sections 173.234 and
107 173.236.
108 (2) A student who has previously received any other
109 state-funded veteran-dependent tuition grant, waiver, or
110 scholarship, including, but not limited to, grants
111 established in sections 173.234 and 173.236, shall not be

SB 1048 5
112 eligible to receive a tuition waiver pursuant to this
113 section.
114 (3) A student shall not concurrently receive a tuition
115 waiver pursuant to this section and any other state-funded
116 veteran-dependent tuition grant, waiver, or scholarship,
117 including, but not limited to, grants established in
118 sections 173.234 and 173.236, but such student may elect to
119 use the program that provides the greatest financial benefit.
120 9. A recipient of a tuition waiver may transfer from
121 one institution to another without losing such recipient's
122 entitlement to such tuition waiver.
123 10. If a recipient of a tuition waiver is granted
124 financial assistance under any other student aid program,
125 whether public or private, the full amount of such financial
126 assistance shall be reported to the Missouri veterans
127 commission by the institution and the recipient.
128 11. The Missouri veterans commission shall promulgate
129 all necessary rules for the implementation of the provisions
130 of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
131 term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under
132 the authority delegated in this section shall become
133 effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of
134 the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section
135 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and
136 if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
137 pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective
138 date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently
139 held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking
140 authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28,
141 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓